Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB140.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 162.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief state school officer shall be furnished a copy of all plans and
specifications for new public school buildings contemplated by boards of education
and for all additions to or alterations of old buildings. The chief state school
officer[He] shall:
(a) Examine or cause to be examined the[all such] plans and specifications; and
(b) [shall ]Approve or disapprove the plans and specifications[them] in
accordance with the administrative[rules and] regulations promulgated by[of]
the Kentucky Board of Education in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) Plan reviews for conformance with the Uniform State Building Code shall be
conducted only by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
(3) A[No] board of education shall not[may] award a contract for the erection of a new
building or contract for an addition to or alteration of an old building until the plan
has been approved by the chief state school officer.
(4) Before construction on a new public school building may begin, the school
district shall notify the Transportation Cabinet of the proposed site location and
the Transportation Cabinet shall, within ninety (90) days, furnish the chief state
school officer with:
(a) A design and cost estimate for all new routes necessary for access to the
building site; and
(b) An identification of and cost estimates for improvements to existing routes
that serve the building site.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/23/2026 11:48 AM Jacketed